Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5263
Board; report required; contents.

The board shall study and report at least
every three years to the director on the effectiveness of the Small Employer
Health Insurance Availability Act. The report shall analyze the effectiveness
of the act in promoting rate stability, product availability, and coverage
affordability. The report may contain recommendations for actions to improve
the overall effectiveness, efficiency, and fairness of the small group health
insurance marketplace. The report shall address whether carriers, agents,
and brokers are fairly and actively marketing or issuing health benefit plans
to small employers in fulfillment of the purposes of the act. The report may
contain recommendations for market conduct or other regulatory standards or
action.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 41;

Laws 2009, LB154, § 11.